Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-336
Department; mental health board; forms; rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide the mental health boards with blanks for warrants, certificates, and other forms, such as will enable them to comply with sections 83-313 to 83-357, and also with printed copies of the applicable rules and regulations of the department.

G.S.1873, c. 31, § 55, p. 425;

R.S.1913, § 7277;

C.S.1922, § 6933;

C.S.1929, § 83-738;

R.S.1943, § 83-336;

Laws 1947, c. 335, § 26, p. 1066;

Laws 1969, c. 818, § 19, p. 3122;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 89;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 225;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 133;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 788.